Tennessee statutes. Title 4 State Government
Part 7

Malicious Harassment

4-21-701. Creation of civil action — Damages.

There is hereby created a civil cause of action for malicious harassment.

A person may be liable to the victim of malicious harassment for both special and general damages, including, but not limited to, damages for emotional distress, reasonable attorney's fees and costs, and punitive damages.

Acts 1990, ch. 908, § 1; 1996, ch. 675, § 8.

Cross-References. Harassment, §39-17-308.

Instruction to raise awareness and prevent hate crimes and sexual offenses, §49-7-137.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence. 6A Tenn. Juris., Constitutional Law, § 71; 23 Tenn. Juris., Threats, § 2.

Attorney General Opinions. When this section is read in context and as it relates to T.C.A. §39-17-309, an individual would not have a cause of action for malicious harassment under this section unless the person alleging malicious harassment claimed that it occurred because of her race, color, ancestry, religion or national origin, OAG 04-129, 2004 Tenn. AG LEXIS 137 (8/11/04).

4-21-702. Alternative remedies preserved.

The remedy for malicious harassment provided in this part shall be in addition to, and shall not preclude victims from seeking, other remedies, criminal or civil, otherwise available under the law.

Acts 1990, ch. 908, § 1.

Cross-References. Civil rights intimidation, §39-17-309.

Harassment, §39-17-308.